District of Columbia statutes.
21-2201

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to affirm the right of all competent adults to control decisions relating to their own health care and to have their rights and intentions in health care matters respected and implemented by others if they become incapable of making or communicating decisions for themselves.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-189, § 2, 35 DCR 8653
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 23(b), 40 DCR 6311
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(y), 45 DCR 745
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-72, § 2(c)(1), 63 DCR 208

History

1981 Ed., § 21-2201.

Prior Codifications

The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-72 substituted “subchapter” for “chapter.”

Effect of Amendments

Editor's Notes

As to life sustaining treatment, termination of treatment, due process, termination of nutrition and hydration, clear and convincing evidence standard, and substituted judgment of family members, see Cruzan by Cruzan v. Director, Missouri Dept. of Health, U.S.Mo. 1990, 110 S.Ct. 2841, 497 U.S. 261, 111 L.Ed.2d 224 (1990).

As to equal protection, assisted suicide ban, right to withdraw life-sustaining medical treatment, see Vacco v. Quill, U.S.N.Y. 1997, 117 S.Ct. 2293, 521 U.S. 793, 138 L.Ed.2d 834, concurring opinion 117 S.Ct. 2302, 521 U.S. 702, 138 L.Ed.2d 772 (1990).